Maine, session 132, LD1750.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §6030-K is enacted to read:
§6030-K. Model residential lease
1. Model residential lease. By December 1, 2025, the Attorney General shall create
and post on the Attorney General's publicly accessible website a model lease for residential
property that complies with current law, including any disclosure and any document
required to be attached to a residential lease. The Attorney General shall update the model
lease biennially and post the revised model lease no later than December 1st of every odd-
numbered year.
2. Implementation. The Attorney General shall implement this section within
existing resources.
Page 1 - 132LR1655(03)